Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2609
Applicant for licensure based on license outside the state; requirements; military spouse; temporary license.

(1) In addition to the standards set by the board pursuant to section 38-126, an applicant for licensure based on a license in another state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia must have been actively engaged in the practice of optometry for at least two of the three years immediately preceding the application for licensure in Nebraska and must provide satisfactory evidence of being credentialed in such other jurisdiction at a level with requirements that are at least as stringent as or more stringent than the requirements for the comparable credential being applied for in this state.

(2) An applicant who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary license as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 881;

Laws 2008, LB972, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 84.